Illinois, session 104th, HB5435.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Clinical Social Work and Social Work 5Practice Act is amended by changing Sections 9, 9A, and 12.5 as 6follows: 7    (225 ILCS 20/9)  (from Ch. 111, par. 6359)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)9    Sec. 9. Qualifications for clinical social worker license. 10A person shall be qualified to be licensed as a clinical social 11worker if that person:12        (1) has applied in writing on the prescribed form;13        (2) has not engaged in conduct or actions that would 14    constitute grounds for discipline under this Act;15        (3)(a) demonstrates to the satisfaction of the 16    Department that, subsequent to securing a master's degree 17    in social work from an approved program and obtaining a 18    social worker license under Section 9A or temporarily 19    practicing pending the issuance of a social worker license 20    under Section 9B if the license was ultimately issued, the 21    applicant has successfully completed at least 3,000 hours 22    of satisfactory, supervised clinical professional 23    experience; or  HB5435 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19710 AAS 33159 b1        (b) demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Department 2    that such applicant has received a doctor's degree in 3    social work from an approved program and has, subsequent 4    to receiving the degree, completed at least 2,000 hours of 5    satisfactory, supervised clinical professional experience 6    after obtaining a social worker license under Section 9A 7    or during temporary practice pending the issuance of a 8    social worker license under Section 9B if the license was 9    ultimately issued subsequent to the degree;10        (4) has passed the examination for the practice of 11    clinical social work as authorized by the Department or 12    has completed the examination alternative set forth in 13    Section 8.2; and14        (5) has paid the required fees.15    Notwithstanding paragraph (3), any hours of supervised 16clinical professional experience completed before the 17effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 18Assembly may be counted toward the required hours for 19qualification under this Section if the hours were completed 20subsequent to securing an applicable graduate degree and the 21completed hours would have qualified toward licensure under 22the law in effect at the time the hours were earned. 23(Source: P.A. 103-433, eff. 1-1-24; 104-178, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (225 ILCS 20/9A)  (from Ch. 111, par. 6359A)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)  HB5435 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19710 AAS 33159 b1    Sec. 9A. Qualifications for license as licensed social 2worker. A person shall be qualified to be licensed as a 3licensed social worker if that person:4        (1) has applied in writing on the prescribed form;5        (2) has not engaged in conduct or actions that would 6    constitute grounds for discipline under this Act;7        (3)(a) has a degree from a graduate program of social 8    work approved by the Department; or9        (b) has a degree in social work from an undergraduate 10    program approved by the Department and has successfully 11    completed at least 3,000 hours 3 years of supervised 12    professional experience subsequent to obtaining the degree 13    within a period of no more than 4 years, as established by 14    rule. The Department may grant a waiver for or an 15    extension of the 4-year time period under this 16    subparagraph (b) upon a showing of good cause. If no 17    supervision by a licensed social worker or a licensed 18    clinical social worker is available, then supervised 19    professional experience may include supervision by other 20    appropriate disciplines as defined by rule;21        (4) (blank); and22        (5) has paid the required fees.23    An individual who is in the process of completing the 24hours of supervised professional experience under subparagraph 25(b) of paragraph (3) shall be subject to oversight by the 26Department solely for the purpose of determining the   HB5435 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19710 AAS 33159 b1individual's eligibility for licensure and the eligibility of 2the completed hours for the supervised professional experience 3requirement.4    The Department may, by rule:5        (A) establish standards for supervision, 6    documentation, and verification of any supervised 7    professional experience;8        (B) deny or invalidate any hours of supervised 9    professional experience obtained in violation of this Act 10    or Department rules; and11        (C) deny an application for licensure based on conduct 12    that occurred during the time period in which the 13    applicant was completing the hours of supervised 14    professional experience if the conduct would have 15    constituted grounds for discipline under this Act had the 16    individual been licensed at the time. 17(Source: P.A. 104-178, eff. 1-1-26.) 18    (225 ILCS 20/12.5)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)20    Sec. 12.5. Endorsement. The Department may issue a license 21as a clinical social worker or as a social worker, without the 22required examination, to an applicant licensed under the laws 23of another jurisdiction if the requirements for licensure in 24that jurisdiction are, on the date of licensure, substantially 25equivalent to the requirements of this Act, except for the   HB5435 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19710 AAS 33159 b1requirement to be licensed while obtaining the required 2supervised experience under Section 9, or to any person who, 3at the time of the person's licensure, possessed individual 4qualifications that were substantially equivalent to the 5requirements then in force in this State. An applicant under 6this Section shall pay the required fees.7    An individual applying for licensure as a clinical social 8worker who has been licensed at the independent level in 9another United States jurisdiction for 5 consecutive years 10without discipline is not required to submit proof of 11completion of the education and supervised clinical 12professional experience required in paragraph (3) of Section 139. Individuals with 5 consecutive years of experience must 14submit certified verification of licensure from the 15jurisdiction in which the applicant practiced and must comply 16with all other licensing requirements and pay all required 17fees. 18    If the accuracy of any submitted documentation or the 19relevance or sufficiency of the course work or experience is 20questioned by the Department or the Board because of a lack of 21information, discrepancies or conflicts in information given, 22or a need for clarification, the applicant seeking licensure 23may be required to provide additional information. 24    An applicant has 3 years from the date of application to 25complete the application process. If the process has not been 26completed within 3 years, the application shall be denied, the   HB5435 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19710 AAS 33159 b1fee shall be forfeited, and the applicant must reapply and 2meet the requirements in effect at the time of reapplication. 3(Source: P.A. 102-1053, eff. 6-10-22; 103-1048, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 51, 2027.